Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 7
MEMBERS

7-80-701. Admission of members.

After the filing of a limited liability company's original articles of organization, one or more persons may be admitted as an additional member or members upon the consent of all members.

At any time that a limited liability company has no members, upon the unanimous consent of all the persons holding by assignment or transfer any of the membership interest of the last remaining member of the limited liability company, one or more persons, including an assignee or transferee of the last remaining member, may be admitted as a member or members.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 433, § 1, effective April 18.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 943, § 13, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

Entire section amended, p. 860, § 29, effective July 1.

7-80-702. Interest in limited liability company - transferability of interest.

The interest of each member in a limited liability company constitutes the personal property of the member and may be assigned or transferred. Unless the assignee or transferee is admitted as a member, the assignee or transferee shall only be entitled to receive the share of profits or other compensation by way of income and the return of contributions to which that member would otherwise be entitled and shall have no right to participate in the management of the business and activities of the limited liability company or to become a member.

A member ceases to be a member upon assignment or transfer of all the member's membership interest. A person to whom all of a member's membership interest has been assigned or transferred and who has been admitted as a member has all the rights and powers and is subject to all the restrictions and liabilities of the assignor or transferor with respect to the portion of the membership interest assigned or transferred. The admission of the assignee or transferee releases the assignor or transferor from liability to the limited liability company other than for liabilities under section 7-80-502 or 7-80-606.

A person to whom a portion of a member's membership interest has been assigned or transferred and who has been admitted as a member has all the rights and powers and is subject to all the restrictions and liabilities of the assignor or transferor with respect to the portion of the membership interest assigned or transferred. The admission of the assignee or transferee terminates the assignor's or transferor's rights and powers as a member with respect to the portion of the membership interest assigned or transferred and releases the assignor or transferor from liability to the limited liability company with respect to the portion of the membership interest assigned or transferred other than for liabilities under section 7-80-502 or 7-80-606.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 433, § 1, effective April 18.

L. 94:

(1) amended, p. 718, § 25, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 943, § 14, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

Entire section amended, p. 861, § 30, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(2) amended, p. 227, § 19, effective May 29.

7-80-703. Rights of creditor against a member.

On application to a court of competent jurisdiction by any judgment creditor of a member, the court may charge the membership interest of the member with payment of the unsatisfied amount of the judgment with interest thereon and may then or later appoint a receiver of the member's share of the profits and of any other money due or to become due to the member in respect of the limited liability company and make all other orders, directions, accounts, and inquiries that the debtor member might have made, or that the circumstances of the case may require. To the extent so charged, except as provided in this section, the judgment creditor has only the rights of an assignee or transferee of the membership interest. The membership interest charged may be redeemed at any time before foreclosure. If the sale is directed by the court, the membership interest may be purchased without causing a dissolution with separate property by any one or more of the members. With the consent of all members whose membership interests are not being charged or sold, the membership interest may be purchased without causing a dissolution with property of the limited liability company. This article shall not deprive any member of the benefit of any exemption laws applicable to the member's membership interest.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 433, § 1, effective April 18.

L. 97:

Entire section amended, p. 1505, § 19, effective June 3.

L. 2006:

Entire section amended, p. 862, § 31, effective July 1.

7-80-704. Deceased or incompetent members who are individuals - dissolved or terminated members who are legal entities.

If a member who is an individual dies or a court of competent jurisdiction appoints a guardian or general conservator for the member, the member's executor, administrator, guardian, conservator, or other legal representative may exercise all of the powers of an assignee or transferee of the member.

If a member other than an individual is dissolved or terminated, the legal representative or successor of the member may exercise all of the powers of an assignee or transferee of the member.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2006, p. 862, § 32, effective July 1, 2006.)

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 433, § 1, effective April 18.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 718, § 26, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(1) amended, p. 1461, § 187, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(2) and (3) amended, p. 862, § 32, effective July 1.

7-80-705. Liability of members and managers.

Members and managers of limited liability companies are not liable under a judgment, decree, or order of a court, or in any other manner, for a debt, obligation, or liability of the limited liability company.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 434, § 1, effective April 18.

7-80-706. Voting.

Subject to the provisions of this article that require majority or unanimous consent, vote, or agreement of the members, the operating agreement may grant to all or a stated group of the members the right to consent, vote, or agree, on a per capita or other basis, upon any matter.

Any member may vote in person or by proxy.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 434, § 1, effective April 18.

L. 94:

(2) amended, p. 719, § 27, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(1) amended, p. 2267, § 187, effective July 1, 2004.

7-80-707. Meetings of members. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 434, § 1, effective April 18.

L. 94:

(3) amended, p. 719, § 28, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(1) and (4)(b) amended, p. 2268, § 188, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

Entire section repealed, p. 944, § 15, effective July 1; entire section repealed, p. 1461, § 188, effective July 1.

7-80-708. Quorum of members - vote required. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 435, § 1, effective April 18.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 719, § 29, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

Entire section repealed, p. 944, § 16, effective July 1; entire section repealed, p. 1462, § 189, effective July 1.

7-80-709. Notice of members' meetings. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 435, § 1, effective April 18.

L. 94:

(3) amended, p. 719, § 30, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

Entire section repealed, p. 944, § 17, effective July 1; entire section repealed, p. 1462, § 190, effective July 1.

7-80-710. Waiver of notice. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 435, § 1, effective April 18.

L. 2004:

Entire section repealed, p. 945, § 18, effective July 1; entire section repealed, p. 1462, § 191, effective July 1.

7-80-711. Action by members without a meeting. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 435, § 1, effective April 18.

L. 94:

(1) amended, p. 719, § 31, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(1) amended, p. 2268, § 189, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

Entire section repealed, p. 945, § 19, effective July 1; entire section repealed, p. 1463, § 192, effective July 1.

7-80-712. Information and accounting. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 436, § 1, effective April 18.

L. 2003:

IP(1)(b) amended, p. 2268, § 190, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

Entire section repealed, p. 946, § 20, effective July 1.

7-80-713. Derivative proceeding - standing - definitions.

A member may commence or maintain a derivative proceeding pursuant to this part 7 only where:

The member was a member of the limited liability company at the time of the act or omission complained of or the membership interest in such company thereafter devolved by operation of law; and

It appears that the member fairly and adequately represents the interests of the members similarly situated in enforcing the right of the limited liability company.

For purposes of this part 7, "derivative proceeding" means a civil suit in the right of a domestic limited liability company or, to the extent provided in section 7-80-719, in the right of a foreign limited liability company.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire section added, p. 1725, § 160, effective October 1.

7-80-714. Derivative proceeding - demand.

No member shall commence a derivative proceeding pursuant to this part 7 unless:

A written demand has been made upon the limited liability company to take suitable action; and

Thirty days have expired from the date the demand was made; except that the thirty-day limitation shall not be required where:

The member has been notified prior to the expiration of the thirty-day period that the demand has been rejected by the limited liability company; or

Irreparable injury to the limited liability company would result from waiting for the expiration of the thirty-day period.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire section added, p. 1725, § 160, effective October 1.

7-80-715. Stay of derivative proceeding.

For the purpose of allowing the limited liability company time to undertake an inquiry into the allegations made in a demand or complaint commenced pursuant to this part 7, the court may stay any derivative proceeding for such period as the court deems appropriate.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire section added, p. 1725, § 160, effective October 1.

7-80-716. Dismissal of derivative proceeding.

A derivative proceeding commenced pursuant to this part 7 shall be dismissed by the court on motion by the limited liability company if any one of the groups specified in subsection (2) of this section has determined in good faith, after conducting an inquiry upon which the determination is based, that the maintenance of the derivative action is not in the best interests of the limited liability company.

Subject to the requirements of paragraph (b) of this subsection (2), the determination whether the maintenance of the derivative proceeding is in the best interests of the limited liability company shall be made by the independent manager of the limited liability company or, where there is more than one such manager, by a majority of said managers; except that, if there is no independent manager of the limited liability company or if the majority of such managers is unable to make the determination, the determination shall be made by a majority of the independent members of the limited liability company.

If the determination is not made pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (2), the determination shall be made by the person, or, in the case of more than one person, by a majority of such persons, sitting upon a panel of one or more persons appointed by a court upon motion filed with the court by the limited liability company for such purposes.

The court shall appoint only independent persons to the panel described in paragraph (b) of subsection (2) of this section.

None of the following shall by itself cause a person not to be considered independent for purposes of subsection (2) of this section:

The naming of the person as a defendant in the derivative proceeding or as a person against whom action is demanded;

The approval by such person of the act being challenged in the derivative proceeding or demand where the act did not result in personal benefit to such person;

The making of the demand pursuant to section 7-80-714 or the commencement of the derivative proceeding pursuant to this section.

Subject to section 7-80-717, a panel appointed by the court pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection (2) of this section shall have such authority to continue, settle, or discontinue the derivative proceeding as the court may confer upon such panel.

The plaintiff in the derivative proceeding shall have the burden of proving that any of the requirements of subsections (1) and (2) of this section have not been met.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire section added, p. 1725, § 160, effective October 1.

7-80-717. Discontinuance or settlement of derivative proceeding.

No derivative proceeding commenced pursuant to this part 7 shall be discontinued or settled without the approval of the court. Where the court determines that a proposed discontinuance or settlement will substantially affect the interests of the members of the limited liability company, the court shall direct that notice be given to the members affected.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire section added, p. 1726, § 160, effective October 1.

7-80-718. Payment of expenses - derivative proceeding.

On the termination of a derivative proceeding commenced pursuant to this part 7, where the court finds that the proceeding has resulted in a substantial benefit to the limited liability company, the court may order the limited liability company to pay the plaintiff's reasonable expenses, including attorney fees, incurred by the plaintiff in connection with the maintenance of such proceeding. On the termination of a derivative proceeding commenced pursuant to this part 7, where the court finds that the proceeding was commenced or maintained without reasonable cause or for an improper purpose, the court may order the plaintiff to pay any of the defendant's reasonable expenses, including attorney fees, incurred by the defendant in connection with the defense of such proceeding.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire section added, p. 1726, § 160, effective October 1.

7-80-719. Applicability of derivative proceeding to foreign limited liability companies.

In any derivative proceeding in the right of a foreign limited liability company, the right of a person to commence or maintain a derivative proceeding in the right of a foreign limited liability company and any matters raised in such proceeding covered by sections 7-80-713 to 7-80-718 shall be governed by the law of the jurisdiction under which the foreign limited liability company was formed; except that any matters raised in such proceeding covered by sections 7-80-715 and 7-80-717 shall be governed by the law of this state.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire section added, p. 1727, § 160, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 2268, § 191, effective July 1, 2004.